Washington statutes.
RCW 17.12.030

Determination—Boundaries of district.

Upon the hearing of such petition the board shall determine whether such a district shall be created and shall fix the boundaries thereof, but shall not enlarge the boundaries of proposed districts or enlarge or change the boundary or boundaries of any district or districts already formed without first giving the notice to all parties interested as provided in RCW 17.12.020.

[ 1919 c 152 s 3; RRS s 2803.]